Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1018
Centralized location; vote counting devices; sealing and storage; reuse.

All tapes, programming boards, and other materials used with vote counting devices for the election shall be sealed and stored with the ballots and election materials for that election for the amount of time required by law. Programming boards may be reused after six months have elapsed following an election in which they were used.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 312.